matxin-fo-en.fo.dix
    <pardef n="h/ava__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ava</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avi</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evur</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evur</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ava</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evði</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øvdu</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avt</l>
          <r>ava<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>




    <pardef n="árna__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ði</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ði</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ði</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ðu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ðu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ðu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ður</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="S__comparative">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sætt/i__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <e lm="hava"><i>h</i><par n="h/ava__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrsti"><i>fyrst</i><par n="sætt/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fimti"><i>fimt</i><par n="sætt/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sætti"><i>sætt</i><par n="sætt/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="triðji"><i>triðj</i><par n="sætt/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fjórði"><i>fjórð</i><par n="sætt/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anda"><i>anda</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="árna"><i>árna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ávara"><i>ávara</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avblomstra"><i>avblomstra</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avhenda"><i>avhenda</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avmarka"><i>avmarka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avskriva"><i>avskriva</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="balsamera"><i>balsamera</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="banda"><i>banda</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bara"><i>bara</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bjarga"><i>bjarga</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blaka"><i>blaka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brotna"><i>brotna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bumba"><i>bumba</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="daga"><i>daga</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dálka"><i>dálka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="degna"><i>degna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="drukna"><i>drukna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dýrka"><i>dýrka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eikimála"><i>eikimála</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="endurskoða"><i>endurskoða</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="erva"><i>erva</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fagna"><i>fagna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fána"><i>fána</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fíggja"><i>fíggja</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fjasa"><i>fjasa</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fjøtra"><i>fjøtra</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="føðga"><i>føðga</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="følna"><i>følna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fongsla"><i>fongsla</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="framskriva"><i>framskriva</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="friða"><i>friða</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grannskoða"><i>grannskoða</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grona"><i>grona</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="háða"><i>háða</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="haka"><i>haka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hála"><i>hála</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hálova"><i>hálova</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hata"><i>hata</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="heimila"><i>heimila</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hevja"><i>hevja</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hjúkla"><i>hjúkla</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hótta"><i>hótta</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hugna"><i>hugna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="innkalla"><i>innkalla</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ísna"><i>ísna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="játta"><i>játta</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kalla"><i>kalla</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kasta"><i>kasta</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klaga"><i>klaga</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klóra"><i>klóra</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="korka"><i>korka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kúga"><i>kúga</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="landa"><i>landa</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lokka"><i>lokka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mána"><i>mána</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="megna"><i>megna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="minka"><i>minka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="orða"><i>orða</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prógva"><i>prógva</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rinda"><i>rinda</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ruska"><i>ruska</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="salva"><i>salva</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="seinka"><i>seinka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skila"><i>skila</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skjalprógva"><i>skjalprógva</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sorla"><i>sorla</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="størra"><i>størra</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stuðla"><i>stuðla</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tagna"><i>tagna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tendra"><i>tendra</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="traðka"><i>traðka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="troka"><i>troka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tumma"><i>tumma</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ugga"><i>ugga</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="undirskriva"><i>undirskriva</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vælsigna"><i>vælsigna</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vaska"><i>vaska</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vraka"><i>vraka</i><par n="árna__vblex"/></e>
